Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 6. Wyoming Education Planning and Coordination Council

§ 21-16-601.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1994, ch. 7, § 1; 1997, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 7, § 1, related to education planning and coordination council established.

§ 21-16-602.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1994, ch. 7, § 1; 1995, ch. 33, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.